Nebraska, session 109, LB1096A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1096A LB1096A
2026 2026
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $1 from the General Fund
for FY2026-27 and (2) $1 from the General Fund for FY2027-28 to the
Attorney General, for Program 507, to aid in carrying out the provisions
of Legislative Bill 1096, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session,
2026.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per
diems from funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $1 for
FY2026-27 or $1 for FY2027-28.
-2-